Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 15 Partition

34-15-1.
Cotenants of estates of inheritance.

All joint tenants, coparceners, and tenants in common, who now are or hereafter may be actually seised or possessed of any estate of inheritance in any lands, tenements or hereditaments, whether in their own right or as receiver appointed by any state or federal court, or as trustee in bankruptcy, may be compelled to make partition between them of those lands, tenements, and hereditaments by civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3730, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-1

.

Parties.

Upon a bill for partition by tenants in common, the court would not order joinder of mortgagee whose lien extended over the entire tract, such incumbrancer not being a necessary party, as no relief could be decreed against him. Updike v. Adams,

22 R.I. 432

, 48 A. 384,

1901 R.I. LEXIS 26

(1901).

Trustee in bankruptcy is not a proper party to maintain an action for partition under this section, since it is intended to exclude those who have merely the legal title but are not actually seised or possessed of any estate in their own right. Adelson v. McKenna,

55 R.I. 363

, 181 A. 799,

1935 R.I. LEXIS 39

(1935) (decision prior to 1956 amendment.).

34-15-2.
Cotenants of estates for life or years.

All joint tenants, coparceners, and tenants in common, who now are or hereafter may be actually seised or possessed of any estate for life or years in any lands, tenements, or hereditaments, may be compelled to make the partition between them of such lands, tenements, and hereditaments, to continue until the estate of some of the parties to the lands, tenements, or hereditaments shall determine, and no longer, by civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-2

.

34-15-3.
Cotenants of estates of inheritance and for life or years.

All joint tenants, coparceners, and tenants in common, who now are or hereafter may be actually seised or possessed of any estate for life or years in any lands, tenements, or hereditaments, with others who have estates of inheritance in possession in the same lands, tenements, and hereditaments, may compel or be compelled to make partition of those lands, tenements, and hereditaments, to continue until the estate of some of the parties shall determine, and no longer, by civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-3

.

34-15-4.
Action by executor or administrator as tenant in common.

An executor or administrator with the will annexed, having, by the terms of the testator’s will, power to sell any undivided interest in any real estate of which his or her testator died seised, shall have the power to bring an action to effect a partition of the real estate in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. “Tenant in common” as used in this chapter shall include an executor or administrator acting under this section.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 586, § 31, as enacted by P.L. 1942, ch. 1147, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-4

.

34-15-5.
Joinder of reversioner or remainderman with tenant for life or years.

If the tenant in reversion or remainder in fee joins with the tenant for life or years in compelling partition of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments, against the other co-tenants, the partition shall be of the whole estate, and binding on the heirs and assigns of all parties. No action for partition under this section shall abate by the death of the tenant for life or years or the expiration of the term for years, but the surviving plaintiff may prosecute the action to final judgment and execution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-5

.

34-15-6.
Venue when land situated in two (2) or more counties.

Partition of real estate held in joint tenancy or in common, and situated in two (2) or more counties in the state, may be sued for in any county in which any of the real estate is situated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1164; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-6

.

Parties.

This section does not require the parties to a partition or sale to be cotenants. De Lisi v. Caito, 463 A.2d 167,

1983 R.I. LEXIS 1020

(R.I. 1983).

34-15-7.
Notice to absent or unknown parties.

In actions for partition of real estate, in which it may be alleged or may appear that any party or person interested therein, not a party plaintiff, is not a resident of the state, or where it is alleged or may appear that any person interested has left the state and it is not known where that person is or whether alive or dead, and, if dead, whether that person has left children, or whether some person unknown to the plaintiff is interested therein, the court before whom the action is pending may order notice to be given to any such party or person, by ordering a copy of its order to be published in some newspaper published in this state for such length of time as it may deem proper, and may also, in its discretion, order letters, postpaid and directed to the party or person, to be deposited in the post office; and where notice is given as ordered by the court, it may proceed and render judgment in the action in the same manner and with the same effect as if the party or person had received actual or personal notice or had appeared and answered to the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-7

.

34-15-8.
Notice to absentee by service on tenant in possession.

If a person named defendant in a complaint for partition, being an inhabitant of this state, is temporarily absent from the state, so that, although it may be known where the person is, the complaint or subpoena cannot be personally served upon him or her, legal service may be made by leaving a copy of the complaint or subpoena with the tenant in possession of the estate whereof partition is demanded, if there is a tenant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-8

.

34-15-9.
Continuance on failure of absentee to appear — Appointment of agent.

If the defendant does not appear to answer the partition action, the cause shall be continued or delayed until his or her return, provided the defendant on or before the expiration of three (3) months from the time when the proceeding shall have been commenced, at which time, if the defendant does not appear to answer the action, the court shall appoint some discreet and disinterested person as agent of the defendant, who shall defend the action, and in case judgment is rendered for partition, shall attend to the partition to be made and take care of the interest of the person for whom he or she has been appointed agent as aforesaid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-9

.

34-15-10.
Summons of party omitted from original process.

In any action for partition, if any person who ought to be a party to the action is omitted, the action shall not be thereby abated; but if the omission of the party is pleaded, a summons shall issue to the person thus omitted, which summons shall be served in the manner prescribed by law at least twenty (20) days before trial, and the person may come in and defend in the same manner as though he or she had been originally made a party to the action, and if the person thus summoned appears or neglects to appear, his or her name may be inserted in the process by the court, and judgment shall be rendered in the action in the same manner as if the person had been originally a party.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-10

.

34-15-11.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

If, in any such action, the defendant is an infant, of unsound mind or otherwise incapacitated to take care of his or her right and estate, the court before which such action shall be pending shall appoint some discreet and disinterested person as guardian to defend the infant, person of unsound mind, or person otherwise incapacitated, against the action, and in case of judgment for partition, to attend to the partition to be made, and take charge of the interest of the person for whom he or she is appointed guardian.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 11.

34-15-12.
Death of party — Substitution of heirs or devisees.

No action for partition shall be abated by the decease of either of the parties plaintiff or defendant in the action. In case of the decease of either of the plaintiffs or defendants in the action, the court shall cause the heirs at law or devisees of the deceased party to be notified of the pendency of the action in the same manner as if they had been parties in the original action, and may, after the notice has been given, render judgment in the action in the same manner as might have been done had the heirs or devisees been original parties in the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-12

.

34-15-13.
Voluntary appearance by heirs or devisees of deceased party.

If the deceased person’s heirs or devisees voluntarily appear in court without notice as provided in §

34-15-12

, the court may proceed without further delay to try, render judgment, and proceed in the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-13

.

34-15-14.
Joint or several answers.

In actions for partition against several defendants, each of the defendants may answer severally, or any two (2) or more may answer jointly, and in their answers set forth the right or interest which they and each of them have in the estate for the partition of which the action is commenced.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-14

.

34-15-15.
Order to set off share of party.

In actions for partition, the court may order the share of any plaintiff or of any defendant, or of any two (2) or more of the parties plaintiff and defendant, to be set off to the party or parties, dividing the remainder or leaving it undivided, in its discretion.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-15

.

34-15-16.
Order of sale.

In an action for partition, the superior court may, in its discretion, upon motion of any party to the action, order the whole premises sought to be divided, or any particular lot, portion, or tract thereof or the interest of the plaintiff or plaintiffs or of the defendant or defendants in the whole premises, or in any particular lot, portion, or tract thereof, to be sold, either at public auction or by private contract, under the direction of the court, by the commissioner or commissioners appointed to divide or sell the same; provided, that if the sale is made by private contract, it shall not be made for less than the sum fixed by the court in its decree authorizing the sale by private contract.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 16; P.L. 1914, ch. 1084, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-16

.

Division by Metes and Bounds.

Where property could not be partitioned by metes and bounds, court was required under this section to exercise sound discretion and to consider all facts before it allowed partition by sale. Bianchini v. Bianchini,

76 R.I. 30

, 68 A.2d 59,

1949 R.I. LEXIS 89

(1949).

The trial court’s finding that it would be impractical to divide by metes and bounds property consisting of a single house with separate apartments on the first and second floors located on a single parcel of land was upheld. Matracia v. Matracia,

119 R.I. 431

, 378 A.2d 1388,

1977 R.I. LEXIS 2102

(1977).

34-15-17.
Sale binding on parties to action.

No person interested in the estate and not a party to the action shall be bound by the sale, but the court may, upon motion, proceed to make all persons interested in the estate parties to the action, though nonresident, absent, or unknown, in the manner provided in this chapter; in which case, if the whole of their shares of the estate are ordered to be sold, the decree shall forever thereafter, in favor of the purchaser of the estate or shares, and of those claiming under or by virtue of the purchaser, be binding upon such nonresident, absent, or unknown person although not appearing to the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-17

.

34-15-18.
Division of proceeds of sale — Share set aside for absent or unknown parties.

In case of a sale under this chapter, the proceeds of the sale shall be divided, under the direction of the court, between the parties entitled thereto, in lieu of their interest in the estate ordered or decreed to be sold, and the portion of the proceeds of sale to which any party or person absent from the state or unknown and not appearing to claim the proceeds, may be entitled, may be invested for that person by the commissioners, under the direction of the court, and in such name as the court may direct, after deducting from that portion the reasonable share of the costs and expenses of partition of the party or persons, to be allowed by the court to those entitled thereto. In all cases the investment and the further disposition of the proceeds, and the deposit and disposition to be made of the evidence thereof, shall be subject only to the order and control of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-18

.

34-15-19.
Adjudication of all claims.

Whenever in any action for partition of real estate it is alleged or it appears that any person claims or may claim any right, title, or interest in the estate adversely or otherwise to any party to the action, the court before whom the action is pending may order that person to appear and make his or her claim in writing therein within such time as shall be prescribed by the order, or in default thereof to be forever barred from all right, title, interest, and claim in and to the estate or any part thereof, service of the order, actual or constructive, by publication or otherwise, to be made upon the person as the court shall direct; and the court may thereupon proceed, and, if the person does not appear as required by the order, may adjudge that he or she has no right, title, interest, or claim in or to the estate, or, whether he or she appears or not, may itself, in such manner as it deems proper, or by a jury upon issues framed for that purpose, try and determine what, if any, right, title, interest, or claim he or she has therein, and adjudge accordingly, and the judgment in either event shall be final.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-19

.

34-15-20.
Partition of lands of fee holders and of life tenants, reversioners, and remaindermen.

Partition may be made of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments between the person or persons who hold the fee of any share or shares thereof, and the person or persons who hold or are or may be entitled to any share or shares thereof, for life or in reversion or remainder, and whether the remainder is vested or contingent, and whether it is to persons in being and ascertained or to persons not in being or to be ascertained thereafter, or subject to be opened to let in those afterwards to come into being or having other interests whatsoever, vested or contingent, therein; provided, that all persons in being at the time of the commencement of the action for partition, interested in the estate, are made parties to the proceedings and their title or interest fully shown upon the record by the pleadings; and provided, also, that before final judgment or decree for partition or sale in any such case the court shall appoint some discreet person to represent the interest of persons, if any, not then in being, whose reasonable charges, as allowed by the court, shall be taxed in the costs and be a charge upon the share or shares of the estate in which the parties not in being shall or may be interested.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-20

.

Form of Partition.

This section authorizes voluntary, not compulsory, partition. Duffy v. Maciag, 431 A.2d 1233,

1981 R.I. LEXIS 1183

(R.I. 1981).

34-15-21.
Title vested by sale — Investment for benefit of reversioner or remainderman.

In the event of partition, by sale and division of the proceeds in any partition case under this chapter, the sale shall vest in the purchaser an absolute estate in fee simple in the lands, tenements, or hereditaments so sold, and the share or shares of the proceeds representing the share or shares of the estate subject to reversion or remainder after deducting and paying therefrom their proportional parts of the costs and expenses of partition, as determined by the court, shall be invested, under the order of the court, for the benefit of the person interested, or who may become interested in the proceeds, in the same manner as is provided in case of unknown parties in §

34-15-18

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-21

.

34-15-22.
Apportionment of costs.

In an action for partition, the court before which the action may be pending may adjudge and determine, as to it shall appear equitable and just, relative to the apportionment of costs among the parties, plaintiff and defendant, by dividing the costs equally or subjecting either party to the payment of the whole or any part thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-22

.

Division of Costs.

Trial justice did not abuse his discretion in dividing costs equally between owner of three-fourths interests and owner of one-fourth interest where the owner of the larger interest had managed the property for many years without charge. Barney v. Barney,

83 R.I. 182

, 114 A.2d 399,

1955 R.I. LEXIS 35

(1955).

34-15-23.
Costs as lien on property.

In an action for partition, the costs of partition, in such proportion as the court trying the action shall adjudge to be paid by any party or parties to the action, shall be a lien upon the interest of any party or parties in the several shares assigned to the party or parties, and in addition to the mode of recovery now used, may be recovered by sale of the several shares upon execution, to be issued in due form therefor in favor of the party or parties who may, by payment of the costs, be entitled to recover the costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-23

.

34-15-24.
Appointment of persons to make partition.

In actions for partition, after judgment for partition has been entered, the superior court on motion shall appoint and commission one or more discreet, impartial, and disinterested persons to make partition pursuant to such judgment, who shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 24; C. P. A. 1905, § 1165; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-24

.

34-15-25.
Partition by persons appointed.

The persons so appointed, first giving reasonable notice to the respective parties, shall make partition between them according to their several rights, as ascertained by the judgment of the court ordering the partition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-25

.

34-15-26.
Notice by commissioners nonresidents and to absent or unknown parties.

In case nonresident, absent, or unknown parties or persons are interested in the partition, the court issuing the partition shall order such notice to be given to the parties or persons interested, by the commissioners appointed to make partition, as the court shall judge proper, and the notice, when given, shall for all purposes be as effectual as personal notice.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-26

.

34-15-27.
Report of commissioners — Judgment — Recording.

In an action for partition, the commissioners appointed to make the partition shall report their proceedings, with a plat of the division by them made, to the court by which they have been appointed, and if no sufficient cause is shown for rejecting the report, judgment shall be rendered thereon in conformity thereto, and the report, plat, and judgment shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or towns in which the estate is, the expense of which record shall be made a part of the costs in the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, §§ 27, 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, §§ 27, 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, §§ 27, 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, §§ 27, 28; G.L. 1956, §§

34-15-27

,

34-15-28

.

34-15-28.
Vesting of title.

The recording of the plat and judgment pursuant to this chapter shall vest the legal title to the property therein described in the persons to or among whom the property is divided or allotted, and no conveyance shall be required to be executed for the purpose of vesting legal title in those persons.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

34-15-29

.

34-15-29.
Subdivision and platting of lands.

In all actions for partition, whenever the circumstances in the opinion of the court require that the land to be divided should be platted into lots and certain portions of land laid out for streets or gangways for the convenience of the lots, the decree may authorize the commissioners to take that course subject to the approval of the court on the return of their report.

The action described in subsection (a) shall not be taken unless all the parties to the proceedings consent; provided that:

If any party is an infant or person non compos mentis, the consent of the guardian ad litem of such infant or non compos shall be sufficient;

If any party is a trustee, the consent of that trustee shall be sufficient to bind the trust estate; and

Any party in interest, being a married woman, shall have the right to consent as if sole and unmarried.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 30; G.L. 1956, § 34-15-30.